North Carolina, session 2025, SB68.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-84.2(d), a local board of education may
determine the dates of opening and closing the public schools in its local school administrative
unit, provided that the dates are in accordance with the requirements of G.S. 115C-84.2(a)(1).
Prior to determining the opening and closing dates, the board shall hold a public hearing on
whether to depart from the requirements of G.S. 115C-84.2(d). If, based on parent and
community input received at the hearing, the board decides to depart from the requirements of
G.S. 115C-84.2(d), the board shall select the opening and closing dates for its schools only after
an additional public hearing to allow for parent and community input on the date determination.
SECTION 2. This act applies only to Pitt County Schools and Edgecombe County
Schools.
SECTION 3. By October 15, 2025, the Pitt County Board of Education and
Edgecombe County Board of Education shall report to the Department of Public Instruction on
the implementation of this act, including any effects on student achievement and any
recommendations on the modification, continuation, and potential expansion of the calendar
flexibility provided in this act. The Department shall forward the reports to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee no later than November 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies for the
2025-2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-2028 school years only.
*S68-v-1*